New Jersey, session 222, A5092.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Each school district shall annually report to the Commissioner of Education, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, information on employment and programmatic changes for each school in the district.  The information shall include, but not be limited to, the following information for the prior school year: (1) the number of positions eliminated by the district; (2) the number of job postings advertised by the district; (3) any programmatic changes by the district including curricula or programs that have been added, eliminated, or restructured; and (4) the number of extracurricular activities that have been added or eliminated by the district. b.  The Commissioner of Education shall compile the information submitted by school districts pursuant to subsection a. of this section and publish and maintain the information on the Department of Educations Internet website in a user-friendly format. 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year next following the date of enactment.